Utah statutes.
59-24-104.   Payment of tax.
(1)  The tax imposed by Section 59-24-103 shall be paid by the owner or
operator of a radioactive waste facility that receives radioactive waste for
disposal or reprocessing.
(2)  The payment shall be accompanied by the form prescribed by the
commission.
(3)  The payment shall be paid quarterly on or before the last day of the
month next succeeding each calendar quarterly period.
